Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.160

Contracts, rights and powers of associations not affected.

No provision of this chapter shall be deemed or construed to:

(1) Affect or impair the contracts of any such cooperative association with its members or other producers marketing their milk through such corporation;

(2) Impair or affect any contract which any such cooperative association has with milk dealers or others which are not in violation of this chapter;

(3) Affect or abridge the rights and powers of any such cooperative association conferred by the laws of this state under which it is incorporated.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 16.]